Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5007.01
Appeals by county assessor; appointment of attorney.

In appeals by a county assessor in his or her official capacity pursuant to section 77-5007, the county assessor may request that the district court appoint an attorney to represent the county assessor before the commission. Upon a showing of good cause, the district court may make such an appointment by an order to be entered upon the minutes of the court. Any attorney so appointed shall receive no compensation from the county except as provided for in section 23-1204.01.

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 26.